District of Columbia statutes.
46-303.02

Proceeding by minor parent.

A minor parent, or a guardian or other legal representative of a minor parent, may maintain a proceeding on behalf of, or for the benefit of, the minor’s child.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 302, 42 DCR 6748
June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(c)(2), 53 DCR 3634

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-343.2.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-137, in section heading, substituted “Proceeding” for “Action”.

Effective Dates

Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 302 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).